en: E999(i), Quillaia extract type 1
xx: E999(i)

en: E999(ii), Quillaia extract type 2
xx: E999(ii)

en: Exxx, Exxx food additive
xx: Exxx
fi: Exxx, Exxx elintarvikelisäaine
fr: Exxx, Rouge citrin n°2, Rouge Citrin No 2, rouge citrin numéro 2

en: E1000, Cholic acid
xx: E1000
ar: E1000, حمض الكوليك
az: E1000, Xolik turşusu
bg: E1000, Холева киселина
ca: E1000, Àcid còlic
cs: E1000, Kyselina cholová
da: E1000, Cholsyre
de: E1000, Cholsäure
el: E1000, Χολικό οξύ
eo: E1000, Kolska acido
es: E1000, Ácido cólico
et: E1000, Koolhape
fi: E1000, Koolihappo, Koolihappoa
fr: E1000, Acide cholique
hu: E1000, Kólsav
it: E1000, Acido colico
ja: E1000, コール酸
ko: E1000, 콜산
lt: E1000, Cholio rūgštis
lv: E1000, Holskābe
nl: E1000, Cholinezuur
pl: E1000, Kwas cholowy
pt: E1000, Ácido cólico
ro: E1000, Acid colic
ru: E1000, Холевая кислота
sk: E1000, Kyselina cholová
sl: E1000, Holna kislina
sv: E1000, Cholsyra
tr: E1000, Kolik asit
uk: E1000, Холева кислота
zh: E1000, 胆酸

en: E1001, Choline salt
xx: E1001
ar: E1001, ملح الكولين
az: E1001, Xolin duzu
bg: E1001, Холинова сол
ca: E1001, Sal de colina
cs: E1001, Cholinová sůl
da: E1001, Cholinsalt
de: E1001, Cholinsalz
el: E1001, Άλας χολίνης
eo: E1001, Kolina salo
es: E1001, Sal de colina
et: E1001, Koliinisool
fa: E1001, نمک کولین
fi: E1001, Koliinin suolat ja esterit, Koliinin suoloja ja estereitä
fr: E1001, Sels et esters de choline, Acétate de choline, Carbonate de choline, Citrate de choline, Tartrate de choline, Lactate de choline
hr: E1001, kolin bitartarat
hu: E1001, Kolin-só
it: E1001, Sale di colina
ja: E1001, コリン塩
ko: E1001, 콜린 염
lt: E1001, Cholino druska
lv: E1001, Holīna sāls
nl: E1001, Cholinezout
pl: E1001, Sól choliny
pt: E1001, Sal de colina
ro: E1001, Esteri și săruri de colină
ru: E1001, Холиновая соль
sk: E1001, Cholínová soľ
sl: E1001, Holinska sol
sv: E1001, Kolinsalt
tr: E1001, Kolin tuzu
uk: E1001, Холінова сіль
zh: E1001, 胆碱盐

en: E1001(i), Choline acetate
xx: E1001(i)

en: E1001(ii), Choline carbonate
xx: E1001(ii)

en: E1001(iii)
xx: E1001(iii)

en: E1001(iv), Choline citrate
xx: E1001(iv)

en: E1001(v), Choline tartrate
xx: E1001(v)

en: E1001(vi), Choline lactate
xx: E1001(vi)

en: E1100, Alpha-Amylase, amylase, E-1100, E 1100
xx: E1100
ar: E1100, أميلاز
bg: E1100
bs: E1100, Amilaza
ca: E1100, amilasa
cs: E1100, Amyláza
da: E1100, amylase, alpha-amylase
de: E1100, Amylasen
el: E1100, Αμυλάση
eo: E1100, amelazo
es: E1100, Amilasa, alfaamilasa
et: E1100, Amülaas
eu: E1100, Amilasa
fa: E1100, آمیلاز
fi: E1100, Amylaasi, Amylaasia, alfa-amylaasi
fr: E1100, Amylases, Amylase, α-amylase, a-amylase, alpha-amylase, alpha-amylases
hr: E1100, alfa-amilaza
hu: E1100, Amiláz, alfa-amiláz, endo-amiláz
it: E1100, Amilasi
lt: E1100
lv: E1100, amilāze
mt: E1100
nl: E1100, Amylase, alfa-amylase
nn: E1100, amylase
pl: E1100, Amylazy
pt: E1100, Amilase
ro: E1100, Amilază
ru: E1100, Амилазы, Амилаза
sk: E1100, Amyláza
sl: E1100, Amilaza
sv: E1100, Amylas

en: E1100(i)
xx: E1100(i)

en: E1100(ii)
xx: E1100(ii)

en: E1100(iii)
xx: E1100(iii)

en: E1100(iv), alpha-Amylase from Bacillus megaterium expressed in Bacillus subtilis
xx: E1100(iv)

en: E1100(v)
xx: E1100(v)

en: E1100(vi)
xx: E1100(vi)

en: E1101, Protease, peptidase, proteinase, EC 3.4, E-1101, E 1101
xx: E1101
ar: E1101, ببتيداز
bs: E1101, Proteaza
ca: E1101, peptidasa
cs: E1101, Proteáza, Proteázy, Proteasa
da: E1101, protease
de: E1101, Peptidase, Proteinase, Proteasen, Protease, Peptidasen
el: E1101, Πεπτιδάση
eo: E1101, peptidazo
es: E1101, Peptidasa, Peptidasas, Proteasas, Proteasa
et: E1101, Proteaasid
fa: E1101, پروتئاز
fi: E1101, Proteaasi, Proteaasia
fr: E1101, Protéases, Protéase, Papaïne, Bromélaïne, Ficine, Peptidase, Coupure protéolytique, Endoprotéase, Peptidases, Endopeptidase, Endopeptidases, Protéinase, Enzyme protéolytique
gl: E1101, Protease
he: E1101, פרוטאז
hu: E1101, Proteáz
hy: E1101, Պրոտեոլիտ ֆերմենտներ
id: E1101, Protease
it: E1101, Proteasi, Peptidasi
ja: E1101, プロテアーゼ
ko: E1101, 단백질 가수 분해 효소
lt: E1101, Peptidazės
ms: E1101, Protease
nb: E1101, protease
nl: E1101, Protease, Endopeptidase, Peptidase
pl: E1101, proteazy, Proteaza, Enzymy proteolityczne, Peptydazy, Peptydaza
pt: E1101, Protease, Exopeptidases, Carboxipeptidase, Endopeptidase, Endopeptidases, Aminopeptidases, Proteases, Carboxipeptidases, Aminopeptidase, Enzima proteolítica, Peptidase, Peptidases, Proteinase, Enzimas proteolíticas, Protease sérica, Exopeptidase
ro: E1101, Proteaze
ru: E1101, Протеаза
sh: E1101, Proteaza
sk: E1101, Proteáza, Proteináza, Proteolytický enzým, Proteázy
sl: E1101, Peptidaza
sr: E1101, Proteaza
sv: E1101, Proteas, Peptidaser, Exopeptidas, Endopeptidaser, Peptidas, Exopeptidaser, Endopeptidas, Proteaser, Proteasenzym
tr: E1101, Proteaz
uk: E1101, Протеаза
vi: E1101, Protease
zh: E1101, 蛋白酶

en: E1101(i)
xx: E1101(i)